Hawaii, session 2026, SB2095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) are a group of man-made chemicals widely used in consumer products, industrial processes, and firefighting foams that are known to persist in the environment and accumulate in the human body over time. Exposure to PFAS has been linked to significant health risks, including but not limited to cancer, liver damage, developmental issues, weakened immune systems, and endocrine disruption. The legislature further finds that PFAS contamination has been detected in water supplies, soil, and air across the United States, raising concerns about the presence of these toxic substances in the State and their impact on the health of the State's residents and natural resources.  The geographic isolation of the State and its reliance on a delicate and limited supply of fresh water heighten the need for a thorough understanding of PFAS contamination and its potential impacts on human health and the environment, as the State's ecosystems, including its waterways, bodies of water, fish, and other animals consumed by humans, are integral to the State's food security and cultural practices.  The legislature therefore finds that it is necessary to test bodies of water, waterways, and fish and other animals for human consumption to identify possible PFAS contamination, assess potential health risks, and ensure the safety of food and water resources in the State. The legislature additionally finds that the creation of a temporary working group to address the presence of PFAS in the State's environment and food and water supplies can provide a centralized and coordinated approach to assess PFAS-related issues, engage with stakeholders, and propose actionable recommendations. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a PFAS working group to investigate the existence and environmental dangers of per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances and other related chemicals. SECTION 2. (a)  There is established within the department of health for administrative purposes the per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) working group. (b) The working group shall comprise the following members: (1)  The director of health or their designee; (2)  The chairperson of the board of land and natural resources or their designee; (3)  The chairperson of the board of agriculture and biosecurity or their designee; (4)  A representative of the Honolulu board of water supply; (5)  A member with expertise in environmental protection or toxic chemicals representing the university of Hawaii system; and (6)  Any other members representing stakeholders that the working group deems relevant, including environmental organizations, industry representatives, and community groups, to be invited by the working group. (c) The working group shall: (1)  Assess ongoing work in the department of health to assess PFAS contamination and provide recommendations on additional locations appropriate for PFAS testing and assessment; (2)  Study sources of potential PFAS contamination in the State; (3)  Examine best practices on PFAS testing, management, and mitigation from other jurisdictions and provide recommendations on how to apply best practices in the State; (4)  Evaluate the environmental and public health risks associated with PFAS exposure, particularly in sensitive ecosystems and vulnerable communities; (5)  Review existing regulations and practices to identify gaps in PFAS management and mitigation; (6)  Propose strategies for testing, monitoring, remediation, and prevention of PFAS contamination; and (7)  Recommend changes to state policies, programs, and resources to address PFAS-related challenges effectively. (d) The members of the working group shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties. (e) No member of the working group shall be subject to chapter 84, Hawaii Revised Statutes, solely because of the member's participation in the working group. (f) The working group shall submit annual interim reports to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2027 and 2028 and a final report no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session 2029. The reports shall include: (1)  Findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation; and (2)  Potential funding sources for the remediation of PFAS in the State. (g) The working group shall cease to exist on June 30, 2029. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.